Illinois, session 104th, HB825.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Live Adult Entertainment Facility Surcharge 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 175/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Live 8Adult Entertainment Facility Surcharge Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-1035, eff. 1-1-13.)